Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-111] Indemnification of
collaborating institutions. (a) The board of regents may indemnify
collaborating institutions from claims arising against them for the gross
negligence or wilful misconduct of the university's officers, employees, and
agents in the course of their employment, in connection with the university's
use, storage, or disposal of materials owned or licensed by a collaborating
institution that are purchased by the university from or transferred to the
university by the collaborating institution for research or training purposes.

(b) The university shall use the materials
transfer agreements recommended and approved by the Association of University
Technology Managers to confer the indemnification authorized by this section.

(c) Indemnification claims authorized by this
section shall be payable solely from the moneys and property of the university
and shall not constitute a general obligation of the State or be secured
directly or indirectly by the full faith and credit of the State or the general
credit of the State or by any revenues or taxes of the State. The board of
regents may obtain loss insurance to cover the liability of the university that
may arise under this section; provided that loss insurance for the university shall
be at the university's expense. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next